data/pdfrb/layout/hyphenation_en.txt
.ab1
ab2c
a2ble
.a1
a2b
ac1c
ad2d
ag2
al1s
an3c
a3p2
ar1d
ar1t
as1c
as1s
at1c
au1
a1v
a3y
be2s4
1ba
2b1
be2
bi2z
1b2
bo2
bp1
bs1
b5t2
b5u2
1ca
c2h2
ci2
1c2
ck1
co3
con1
cp1
cs2
cu2
cy1
1da
dd2
de2
1d2
d4f3
d5i6
dg2
d1i4
d5le
d3o2
ds4
1ea
ea2
e1b
e2c1
e1d
e4ed
e1f
e1g
e1h
ei2
e3j
e1k
e1l
e2m1
e1n
eo2
ep2
e1q
e1r
e4s1
e1t
eu2
e1v
e1w
e1x
ey1
e1z
1fa
fb1
fe2
1f2
ff2
4f3i
fi2
4f5l
1f2
fo1
f4p1
fr2
1ga
g2a
1g2
gd1
ge3
g2gel
g4g3
gi2
1g2
go1
g4p1
g3ra
1ha
he2
1h2
hi2
1h2
ho2
hp1
hs2
hu2
hy1
4i1a
2i1b
i1c4
2i1d
i1e
4if
i1g2
4ih
ii2
i1j4
i1k2
i1l2
2im
2in
4i1o
i1p4
i1q
ir2
4is
i1t4
i1u
2iv
i1w
iw4
ix2
i1y
iz2
1ja
1je
1ji
1jo
1ju
1ka
kb1
1kc
1kd
ke2
1k2
kf1
kg1
k2h
1ki
1kj
kk1
1kl
km1
1kn
ko1
kp1
1kr
ks2
1ku
1kv
1kw
1la
lb1
lc1
ld2
le2
1l2
lf1
lg2
1li
1lj
1lk1
1ll2
1lm1
1ln1
1lo
1lp1
1lq
1lr
1ls
1lt1
1lu
1lv
1lw
1lx
1ly
1lz
4ma
1m2b1
me2
m1f1
m4g3
mi2
4m1l
1mo
1mp
m2s1
mu2
my1
1na
nb1
nc2
nd2
ne2
1n2
nf1
n2g3
1ni
1nj
1nk1
n1l2
1nm1
1nn
1no
n1p1
n1q
1nr
ns2
nt1
1nu
1nv
nw1
ny1
1ob
oc2
o1d4
o1f
og2
oh2
oi2
o1j
o1k
ol2
om1
on4
op2
o1q
o1r
o4s3
o1t
ou2
o1v
ow2
ox1
o1y
oz2
1pa
1p2b
pe2
1p2
pf1
4ph
p2h2
4p1l
1p2
po1
p2p
p1p1
p4p3
ps2
p1t2
4q
1qu
1ra
1r2b1
r1c
rd2
re2
r1d4
1re
r1f4
r1g
r1h4
ri2
4r1l
1rm1
1rn1
ro2
r1p4
r1r4
1rs2
rt1
r1t4
r1u
ru2
r1v
r1w4
1sa
1s2b1
s1c
s1d
se2
s1e
s1f
s1g
sh2
si2
1s2
s1k1
sl1
s1l1
sm2
s1m1
sn1
1so
s1p
s1q
1sr1
s1s1
s1t1
st1
su2
s1w
sy2
4ta
1t2b
tc2
t1d4
te2
t1e
t1f
t1g4
th1
1ti
t1j
t1k
1tl1
1tn1
to2
t1p
t1q
t1r4
t1s1
t1t1
tu2
t1u
t1v
tw1
1ua
ub1
u1c4
u1d
4uf
u1g2
4uh
ui2
u1j4
u1k2
u1l2
4un
u1p4
u1q
ur2
4us
u1t4
u1u
4uv
u1w
ux1
u1y
uz2
1va
1v2b1
vc1
ve2
1v2
v1f1
vi2
v1l
v1o
v1p1
1vs2
vu1
1wa
1w2b
we2
wh1
1wi
1w2
wl1
wn1
1wo
1w2
1wr
1wu
1xa
1xe
1xi
1xo
1xu
1ya
1ye
yi2
1yo
1yu
4za
1z2b1
ze2
1z2
zi2
zo2
zu2
